dictionaries/fi_FI/src/fi_FI.aff
SET ISO8859-1
# TRY
TRY aersoinltcdmubpgzfvhjqxykåäöCMAIESPGJBRFTDVHUOwLKNZYXQWÅÄÖ

PFX A Y 2
PFX A   0     ali         .
PFX A   0     ali-        i

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0     epä         .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0     esi         .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D   0     eri         .

PFX E Y 2
PFX E   0     yli         .
PFX E   0     yli-        i

SFX L Y 9
SFX L   0     kin         .
SFX L   0     ko          .
SFX L   0     kaan        .
SFX L   0     han         .
SFX L   0     pa          .
SFX L   0     kinko       .
SFX L   0     pahan       .
SFX L   0     kohan       .
SFX L   0     kaanko      .

SFX M Y 9
SFX M   0     kin         .
SFX M   0     kö          .
SFX M   0     kään        .
SFX M   0     hän         .
SFX M   0     pä          .
SFX M   0     kinkö       .
SFX M   0     pähän       .
SFX M   0     köhän       .
SFX M   0     käänkö      .

SFX N Y 110
SFX N   0     ni          a
SFX N   0     si          a
SFX N   0     nsa         a
SFX N   0     mme         a
SFX N   0     nne         a
SFX N   0     nikin       a
SFX N   0     nikaan      a
SFX N   0     niko        a
SFX N   0     nipa        a
SFX N   0     nihan       a
SFX N   0     nikinko     a
SFX N   0     nikaanko    a
SFX N   0     nikohan     a
SFX N   0     nipahan     a
SFX N   0     sikin       a
SFX N   0     sikaan      a
SFX N   0     siko        a
SFX N   0     sipa        a
SFX N   0     sihan       a
SFX N   0     sikinko     a
SFX N   0     sikaanko    a
SFX N   0     sikohan     a
SFX N   0     sipahan     a
SFX N   0     nsakin      a
SFX N   0     nsakaan     a
SFX N   0     nsako       a
SFX N   0     nsapa       a
SFX N   0     nsahan      a
SFX N   0     nsakinko    a
SFX N   0     nsakaanko   a
SFX N   0     nsakohan    a
SFX N   0     nsapahan    a
SFX N   0     mmekin      a
SFX N   0     mmekaan     a
SFX N   0     mmeko       a
SFX N   0     mmepa       a
SFX N   0     mmehan      a
SFX N   0     mmekinko    a
SFX N   0     mmekaanko   a
SFX N   0     mmekohan    a
SFX N   0     mmepahan    a
SFX N   0     nnekin      a
SFX N   0     nnekaan     a
SFX N   0     nneko       a
SFX N   0     nnepa       a
SFX N   0     nnehan      a
SFX N   0     nnekinko    a
SFX N   0     nnekaanko   a
SFX N   0     nnekohan    a
SFX N   0     nnepahan    a
SFX N   0     i           [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     si          [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sa          [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mme         [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ne          [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ikin        [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ikaan       [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     iko         [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ipa         [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ihan        [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ikinko      [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ikaanko     [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ikohan      [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     ipahan      [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sikin       [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sikaan      [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     siko        [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sipa        [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sihan       [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sikinko     [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sikaanko    [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sikohan     [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     sipahan     [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sakin       [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sakaan      [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sako        [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sapa        [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sahan       [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sakinko     [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sakaanko    [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sakohan     [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     sapahan     [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmekin      [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmekaan     [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmeko       [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmepa       [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmehan      [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmekinko    [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmekaanko   [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmekohan    [aeiou]n
SFX N   n     mmepahan    [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nekin       [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nekaan      [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     neko        [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nepa        [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nehan       [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nekinko     [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nekaanko    [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nekohan     [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     nepahan     [aeiou]n
SFX N   0     an          [^a]a
SFX N   0     ankin       [^a]a
SFX N   0     ankaan      [^a]a
SFX N   0     anko        [^a]a
SFX N   0     anpa        [^a]a
SFX N   0     anhan       [^a]a
SFX N   0     ankinko     [^a]a
SFX N   0     ankaanko    [^a]a
SFX N   0     ankohan     [^a]a
SFX N   0     anpahan     [^a]a

SFX O Y 110
SFX O   0     ni          ä
SFX O   0     si          ä
SFX O   0     nsä         ä
SFX O   0     mme         ä
SFX O   0     nne         ä
SFX O   0     nikin       ä
SFX O   0     nikään      ä
SFX O   0     nikö        ä
SFX O   0     nipä        ä
SFX O   0     nihän       ä
SFX O   0     nikinkö     ä
SFX O   0     nikäänkö    ä
SFX O   0     niköhän     ä
SFX O   0     nipähän     ä
SFX O   0     sikin       ä
SFX O   0     sikään      ä
SFX O   0     sikö        ä
SFX O   0     sipä        ä
SFX O   0     sihän       ä
SFX O   0     sikinkö     ä
SFX O   0     sikäänkö    ä
SFX O   0     siköhän     ä
SFX O   0     sipähän     ä
SFX O   0     nsäkin      ä
SFX O   0     nsäkään     ä
SFX O   0     nsäkö       ä
SFX O   0     nsäpä       ä
SFX O   0     nsähän      ä
SFX O   0     nsäkinkö    ä
SFX O   0     nsäkäänkö   ä
SFX O   0     nsäköhän    ä
SFX O   0     nsäpähän    ä
SFX O   0     mmekin      ä
SFX O   0     mmekään     ä
SFX O   0     mmekö       ä
SFX O   0     mmepä       ä
SFX O   0     mmehän      ä
SFX O   0     mmekinkö    ä
SFX O   0     mmekäänkö   ä
SFX O   0     mmeköhän    ä
SFX O   0     mmepähän    ä
SFX O   0     nnekin      ä
SFX O   0     nnekään     ä
SFX O   0     nnekö       ä
SFX O   0     nnepä       ä
SFX O   0     nnehän      ä
SFX O   0     nnekinkö    ä
SFX O   0     nnekäänkö   ä
SFX O   0     nneköhän    ä
SFX O   0     nnepähän    ä
SFX O   0     i           [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     si          [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     sä          [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mme         [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ne          [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ikin        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ikään       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ikö         [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ipä         [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ihän        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ikinkö      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ikäänkö     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     iköhän      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     ipähän      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sikin       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sikään      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sikö        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sipä        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sihän       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sikinkö     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sikäänkö    [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     siköhän     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     sipähän     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säkin       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säkään      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säkö        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säpä        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     sähän       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säkinkö     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säkäänkö    [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säköhän     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     säpähän     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmekin      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmekään     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmekö       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmepä       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmehän      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmekinkö    [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmekäänkö   [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmeköhän    [äeiöy]n
SFX O   n     mmepähän    [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nekin       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nekään      [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nekö        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nepä        [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nehän       [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nekinkö     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nekäänkö    [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     neköhän     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     nepähän     [äeiöy]n
SFX O   0     än          [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änkin       [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änkään      [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änkö        [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änpä        [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änhän       [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änkinkö     [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änkäänkö    [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änköhän     [^ä]ä
SFX O   0     änpähän     [^ä]ä
